data/grammar/fst/endings-generated.lexc
++mingni+tn-loc-p-3d:imingni # ;
++mingni+tn-loc-p-3d:SUPPRmingni # ;
++mingni+tn-loc-p-3d:NASALmingni # ;
++miktitut+tn-sim-p-3d:miktitut # ;
++miktitut+tn-sim-p-3d:imiktitut # ;
++miktitut+tn-sim-p-3d:SUPPRmiktitut # ;
++miktitut+tn-sim-p-3d:NASALmiktitut # ;
++miktigut+tn-via-p-3d:miktigut # ;
++miktigut+tn-via-p-3d:imiktigut # ;
++miktigut+tn-via-p-3d:SUPPRmiktigut # ;
++miktigut+tn-via-p-3d:NASALmiktigut # ;
++tik+tn-nom-p-3p:tik # ;
++tik+tn-nom-p-3p:KGUARDtik # ;
++tik+tn-nom-p-3p:sik # ;
++tik+tn-nom-p-3p:itik # ;
++tik+tn-nom-p-3p:isik # ;
++tik+tn-nom-p-3p:SUPPRtik # ;
++tik+tn-nom-p-3p:SUPPRsik # ;
++tik+tn-nom-p-3p:SUPPRtik # ;
++tik+tn-nom-p-3p:SUPPRsik # ;
++mik+tn-gen-p-3p:mik # ;
++mik+tn-gen-p-3p:imik # ;
++mik+tn-gen-p-3p:SUPPRmik # ;
++mik+tn-gen-p-3p:SUPPRmmik # ;
++mik+tn-gen-p-3p:NASALmik # ;
++mingnik+tn-acc-p-3p:mingnik # ;
++mingnik+tn-acc-p-3p:imingnik # ;
++mingnik+tn-acc-p-3p:SUPPRmingnik # ;
++mingnik+tn-acc-p-3p:NASALmingnik # ;
++mingnut+tn-dat-p-3p:mingnut # ;
++mingnut+tn-dat-p-3p:imingnut # ;
++mingnut+tn-dat-p-3p:SUPPRmingnut # ;
++mingnut+tn-dat-p-3p:NASALmingnut # ;
++mingnit+tn-abl-p-3p:mingnit # ;
++mingnit+tn-abl-p-3p:imingnit # ;
++mingnit+tn-abl-p-3p:SUPPRmingnit # ;
++mingnit+tn-abl-p-3p:NASALmingnit # ;
++mingni+tn-loc-p-3p:mingni # ;
++mingni+tn-loc-p-3p:imingni # ;
++mingni+tn-loc-p-3p:SUPPRmingni # ;
++mingni+tn-loc-p-3p:NASALmingni # ;
++miktitut+tn-sim-p-3p:miktitut # ;
++miktitut+tn-sim-p-3p:imiktitut # ;
++miktitut+tn-sim-p-3p:SUPPRmiktitut # ;
++miktitut+tn-sim-p-3p:NASALmiktitut # ;
++miktigut+tn-via-p-3p:miktigut # ;
++miktigut+tn-via-p-3p:imiktigut # ;
++miktigut+tn-via-p-3p:SUPPRmiktigut # ;
++miktigut+tn-via-p-3p:NASALmiktigut # ;
++ngit+tn-nom-p-4s:ngit # ;
++ngit+tn-nom-p-4s:SUPPRngit # ;
++ngit+tn-nom-p-4s:SUPPRngit # ;
++ngita+tn-gen-p-4s:ngita # ;
++ngita+tn-gen-p-4s:ingita # ;
++ngita+tn-gen-p-4s:SUPPRngita # ;
++ngita+tn-gen-p-4s:SUPPRngita # ;
++ngita+tn-gen-p-4s:SUPPRngita # ;
++nginnik+tn-acc-p-4s:nginnik # ;
++nginnik+tn-acc-p-4s:inginnik # ;
++nginnik+tn-acc-p-4s:SUPPRnginnik # ;
++nginnik+tn-acc-p-4s:SUPPRnginnik # ;
++nginnik+tn-acc-p-4s:SUPPRnginnik # ;
++nginnut+tn-dat-p-4s:nginnut # ;
++nginnut+tn-dat-p-4s:inginnut # ;
++nginnut+tn-dat-p-4s:SUPPRnginnut # ;
++nginnut+tn-dat-p-4s:SUPPRnginnut # ;
++nginnut+tn-dat-p-4s:SUPPRnginnut # ;
++nginnit+tn-abl-p-4s:nginnit # ;
++nginnit+tn-abl-p-4s:inginnit # ;
++nginnit+tn-abl-p-4s:SUPPRnginnit # ;
++nginnit+tn-abl-p-4s:SUPPRnginnit # ;
++nginnit+tn-abl-p-4s:SUPPRnginnit # ;
++nginni+tn-loc-p-4s:nginni # ;
++nginni+tn-loc-p-4s:inginni # ;
++nginni+tn-loc-p-4s:SUPPRnginni # ;
++nginni+tn-loc-p-4s:SUPPRnginni # ;
++nginni+tn-loc-p-4s:SUPPRnginni # ;
++ngititut+tn-sim-p-4s:ngititut # ;
++ngititut+tn-sim-p-4s:ingititut # ;
++ngititut+tn-sim-p-4s:SUPPRngititut # ;
++ngititut+tn-sim-p-4s:SUPPRngititut # ;
++ngititut+tn-sim-p-4s:SUPPRngititut # ;
++ngitigut+tn-via-p-4s:ngitigut # ;
++ngitigut+tn-via-p-4s:ingitigut # ;
++ngitigut+tn-via-p-4s:SUPPRngitigut # ;
++ngitigut+tn-via-p-4s:SUPPRngitigut # ;
++ngitigut+tn-via-p-4s:SUPPRngitigut # ;
++ngik+tn-nom-p-4d:ngik # ;
++ngik+tn-nom-p-4d:ngit # ;
++ngik+tn-nom-p-4d:ingik # ;
++ngik+tn-nom-p-4d:ingit # ;
++ngik+tn-nom-p-4d:SUPPRngik # ;
++ngik+tn-nom-p-4d:SUPPRngit # ;
++ngik+tn-nom-p-4d:SUPPRngik # ;
++ngik+tn-nom-p-4d:SUPPRngit # ;
++ngita+tn-gen-p-4d:ngita # ;
++ngita+tn-gen-p-4d:ingita # ;
++ngita+tn-gen-p-4d:SUPPRngita # ;
++ngita+tn-gen-p-4d:SUPPRngita # ;
++ngingnik+tn-acc-p-4d:ngingnik # ;
++ngingnik+tn-acc-p-4d:ingingnik # ;
++ngingnik+tn-acc-p-4d:SUPPRngingnik # ;
++ngingnik+tn-acc-p-4d:SUPPRngingnik # ;
++ngingnut+tn-dat-p-4d:ngingnut # ;
++ngingnut+tn-dat-p-4d:ingingnut # ;
++ngingnut+tn-dat-p-4d:SUPPRngingnut # ;
++ngingnut+tn-dat-p-4d:SUPPRngingnut # ;
++ngingnit+tn-abl-p-4d:ngingnit # ;
++ngingnit+tn-abl-p-4d:ingingnit # ;
++ngingnit+tn-abl-p-4d:SUPPRngingnit # ;
++ngingnit+tn-abl-p-4d:SUPPRngingnit # ;
++ngingni+tn-loc-p-4d:ngingni # ;
++ngingni+tn-loc-p-4d:ingingni # ;
++ngingni+tn-loc-p-4d:SUPPRngingni # ;
++ngingni+tn-loc-p-4d:SUPPRngingni # ;
++ngititut+tn-sim-p-4d:ngititut # ;
++ngititut+tn-sim-p-4d:ingititut # ;
++ngititut+tn-sim-p-4d:SUPPRngititut # ;
++ngititut+tn-sim-p-4d:SUPPRngititut # ;
++ngitigut+tn-via-p-4d:ngitigut # ;
++ngitigut+tn-via-p-4d:ingitigut # ;
++ngitigut+tn-via-p-4d:SUPPRngitigut # ;
++ngitigut+tn-via-p-4d:SUPPRngitigut # ;
++ngit+tn-nom-p-4p:ngit # ;
++ngit+tn-nom-p-4p:ingit # ;
++ngit+tn-nom-p-4p:SUPPRngit # ;
++ngit+tn-nom-p-4p:SUPPRngit # ;
++ngit+tn-nom-p-4p:SUPPRngit # ;
++ngita+tn-gen-p-4p:ngita # ;
++ngita+tn-gen-p-4p:ingita # ;
++ngita+tn-gen-p-4p:SUPPRngita # ;
++ngita+tn-gen-p-4p:SUPPRngita # ;
++ngita+tn-gen-p-4p:SUPPRngita # ;
++nginnik+tn-acc-p-4p:nginnik # ;
++nginnik+tn-acc-p-4p:innik # ;
++nginnik+tn-acc-p-4p:inginnik # ;
++nginnik+tn-acc-p-4p:SUPPRnginnik # ;
++nginnik+tn-acc-p-4p:SUPPRnginnik # ;
++nginnik+tn-acc-p-4p:SUPPRnginnik # ;
++nginnut+tn-dat-p-4p:nginnut # ;
++nginnut+tn-dat-p-4p:innut # ;
++nginnut+tn-dat-p-4p:inginnut # ;
++nginnut+tn-dat-p-4p:SUPPRnginnut # ;
++nginnut+tn-dat-p-4p:SUPPRnginnut # ;
++nginnut+tn-dat-p-4p:SUPPRnginnut # ;
++nginnit+tn-abl-p-4p:nginnit # ;
++nginnit+tn-abl-p-4p:inginnit # ;
++nginnit+tn-abl-p-4p:SUPPRnginnit # ;
++nginnit+tn-abl-p-4p:SUPPRnginnit # ;
++nginnit+tn-abl-p-4p:SUPPRnginnit # ;
++nginni+tn-loc-p-4p:nginni # ;
++nginni+tn-loc-p-4p:inginni # ;
++nginni+tn-loc-p-4p:SUPPRnginni # ;
++nginni+tn-loc-p-4p:SUPPRnginni # ;
++nginni+tn-loc-p-4p:SUPPRnginni # ;
++ngititut+tn-sim-p-4p:ngititut # ;
++ngititut+tn-sim-p-4p:ingititut # ;
++ngititut+tn-sim-p-4p:SUPPRngititut # ;
++ngititut+tn-sim-p-4p:SUPPRngititut # ;
++ngititut+tn-sim-p-4p:SUPPRngititut # ;
++ngitigut+tn-via-p-4p:ngitigut # ;
++ngitigut+tn-via-p-4p:ingitigut # ;
++ngitigut+tn-via-p-4p:SUPPRngitigut # ;
++ngitigut+tn-via-p-4p:SUPPRngitigut # ;
++ngitigut+tn-via-p-4p:SUPPRngitigut # ;
